Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1229
Application to Indian tribes.

(a) A child custody proceeding that pertains to an Indian child as defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C. 1901 et seq., is not subject to the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act to the extent that it is governed by the Indian Child Welfare Act.

(b) A court of this state shall treat a tribe as if it were a state of the United States for the purpose of applying sections 43-1226 to 43-1247.

(c) A child custody determination made by a tribe under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act shall be recognized and enforced under sections 43-1248 to 43-1264.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 4.